test/src/morphology/A-haask_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 

  Adjective - hääˊsǩ class A40e: # Adjective 'fun/hauska' - full paradigm
    hääˊsǩ+A+Pred+Sg: hääˊsǩ
    hääˊsǩ+A+Pred+Pl: hääˊsǩ
    hääˊsǩ+A+Attr: hääˊsǩes
    hääˊsǩ+A+Comp: hääˊsǩab
    hääˊsǩ+A+Superl: hääˊsǩmõs
